Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0473.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 9. (1) The fund shall transmit to each member of the
legislature, the governor, the clerk of the house of
representatives, the secretary of the senate, and the senate and
house fiscal agencies annually a report of its activities. The
report must be transmitted not later than April 10 of each year for
activities in the immediately preceding state fiscal year. The
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


report must not include information exempt from disclosure under
section 5. The report must include, but is not limited to, all of
the following for each program operated under this act:
(a) A list of entities that received financial assistance.
(b) The type of project or product being financed.
(c) The amount and type of financial assistance.
(d) For each separate form of financial assistance, all of the
following:
(i) The number of new jobs committed or projected when the
financial assistance was applied for.
(ii) The number of retained jobs committed or projected when
the financial assistance was applied for.
(iii) The actual number of new jobs created that are not
temporary employees.
(iv) The actual number of retained jobs that are not temporary
employees.
(v) The average annual salary of the new jobs created that are
not temporary employees.
(vi) The average annual salary of the retained jobs that are
not temporary employees.
(e) The duration of the financial assistance.
(f) The amount of financial support other than state
resources.
(g) Money or other revenue or property returned to the fund,
including any repayments through a clawback provision in the
agreement.
(h) The status of all loans of the fund.
(i) A list of all entities that are in bankruptcy, of which
the fund has received actual notice, filed by a direct recipient of
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


an active single incentive of not less than $500,000.00. In
addition, the fund shall, within not later than 120 days after the
fund receives notice, provide a report of the notice of bankruptcy
on its website and forward the report to each of the following:
(i) The senate majority leader and the senate minority leader.
(ii) The speaker of the house and the house minority leader.
(iii) The members of the house commerce and tourism economic
competitiveness committee.
(iv) The members of the house appropriations subcommittee on
general government.
(v) The members of the senate economic and small business
community development committee.
(vi) The members of the senate appropriations subcommittee on
general government.
(j) A summary of the approximate administrative costs used to
administer the programs and activities authorized under this act.
(k) Any other information as required by this section.
(2) The auditor general or a certified public accountant
appointed by the auditor general annually shall conduct and remit
to the legislature an audit of the fund permitted under section 53
of article IV of the state constitution of 1963, and, in the
conduct of the audit, shall have access to all records of the fund
at any time, whether or not confidential. Each audit required by
this section must include a determination of whether the fund is
likely to be able to continue to meet its obligations, including a
report on the status of outstanding loans and agreements made by
the fund.
(3) The fund shall also transmit the audit described in
subsection (2) to the chairperson and minority vice-chairperson of
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


the senate appropriations subcommittee on general government and
the house of representatives appropriations subcommittee on general
government. The fund shall make the report and audit available to
the public on the fund's website.
(4) The report described in subsection (1) must also contain
all of the following that are related to a 21st century investment
made by the fund board under chapter 8A:
(a) The amount of qualified venture capital fund investments,
qualified mezzanine fund investments, and qualified private equity
fund investments under management in this state, including year-to-
year growth.
(b) The value of loan enhancement program investments,
qualified private equity fund investments, qualified mezzanine fund
investments, and qualified venture capital investments in qualified
businesses, including year-to-year growth.
(c) A statement of the amount of money in each loan reserve
fund established under the small business capital access program
required under chapter 8A.
(5) The report described in subsection (1) must also include,
but is not limited to, all of the following for all actions under
section 88r:
(a) The total actual amount of qualified investment attracted
under section 88r as reported to the fund.
(b) The total actual number of new jobs created under section
88r as reported to the fund.
(c) The actual amount of the grant, loan, or other economic
assistance made under section 88r separately for each qualified
business verified by the fund.
(d) For each qualified business, whether it is a new business,
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


whether it is an expansion of an existing business, or whether it
relocated from outside of this state.
(e) An evaluation of the aggregate return on investment that
this state realizes on the actual qualified new jobs and actual
qualified investment made by qualified businesses.
(6) The report described in subsection (1) must also include,
but is not limited to, all of the following for all actions under
chapter 8B:
(a) For tourism promotion efforts, all of the following:
(i) An itemized list, by market, of how much was spent, types
of media purchased, and target of the tourism promotion campaign.
(ii) The return on investment analysis that utilizes existing
baseline data and compares results with prior outcome evaluations
funded by Travel Michigan.
(b) For business development efforts, all of the following:
(i) An itemized list, by market, of how much was spent, types
of media purchased, and target of the business promotion campaign.
(ii) A performance analysis that compares the program or
campaign objectives and outcome of the campaign or program.
(7) The report described in subsection (1) must also include,
but is not limited to, all of the following for all actions under
section 90d:
(a) The total actual amount of private investment attracted
under section 90d as reported to the fund.
(b) The actual amount of the community revitalization
incentives made under chapter 8C separately for each project.
(c) The total actual amount of square footage revitalized or
added for each project approved under section 90d as reported to
the fund. When reporting square footage, the person must report the
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


square footage by category, including, but not limited to,
commercial, residential, or retail.
(d) The aggregate increase in taxable value of all property
subject to a written agreement under chapter 8C when established
and recorded by the local units of government and as reported to
the fund.
(e) The total actual number of residential units revitalized
or added for each project approved under section 90d as reported to
the fund.
(f) Each project that received a community revitalization
incentive outside the fund program standards and guidelines and why
the variance was given.
(8) Beginning on and after January 1, 2012, on a monthly basis
the fund shall provide exact copies of all information regarding
all actions under chapter 8C that is provided to board members of
the fund for the purpose of monthly board meetings, subject to
confidentiality under section 5, to each of the following and post
that information on the fund's website:
(a) The chairperson and minority vice-chairperson of the house
commerce and tourism economic competitiveness committee.
(b) The chairperson and minority vice-chairperson of the house
appropriations subcommittee on general government.
(c) The chairperson and minority vice-chairperson of the
senate economic and small business community development committee.
(d) The chairperson and minority vice-chairperson of the
senate appropriations subcommittee on general government.
(9) The report described in subsection (1) must also include a
summary of the approximate administrative costs used to administer
the programs and activities authorized in the following sections:
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


(a) Section 88b.
(b) Section 88h.
(c) Section 90b.
(10) The report described in subsection (1) must also include,
but is not limited to, all of the following for all actions for
business incubators approved by the fund after January 14, 2015:
(a) The number of new jobs created and projected new job
growth by current clients of the business incubator.
(b) Amounts of other funds leveraged by current clients of the
business incubator.
(c) Increases in revenue for current clients of the business
incubator.
(11) The report described in subsection (1) must also include
the actual repayments received by the fund for failure to comply
with clawback provisions of the written agreement under all of the
following:
(a) Section 78.
(b) Section 88d.
(c) Section 88k.
(d) Section 88q.
(e) Section 88r.
(f) Section 90b.
(g) Chapter 8F.
(12) Beginning on July 1, 2015, the fund shall post on the
fund's website a list of each contract, agreement, or other written
loan or grant documentation for financial assistance under sections
88r and 90b that the fund entered into or modified in the
immediately preceding fiscal year.
(13) Beginning on July 1, 2015, the fund shall post and update
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


periodically all of the following on its website for all loans made
under sections 88r and 90b:
(a) A description of the project for which the loan was made.
(b) The total amount of the loan.
(c) Whether payments on the loan balance are current or
delinquent.
(d) The interest rate of the loan.
(14) Beginning July 1, 2015, the report described in
subsection (1) must also contain all of the following for each
program that provides financial assistance under this act that
requires a site visit:
(a) A copy of the site visit guidelines for that program.
(b) The number of site visits conducted under that program.
(c) The chief compliance officer shall review and evaluate
compliance with the site visit guidelines.
(15) The fund shall post on its website and update
periodically all of the information described in subsection (14).
(16) The report described in subsection (1) must also include,
but is not limited to, all of the following for all written
agreements related to the good jobs for Michigan program created
under chapter 8D or the more jobs for Michigan program created
under chapter 8F:
(a) The name of the authorized business or authorized
employer.
(b) The number of certified new jobs or protected jobs
required to be created or maintained.
(c) The amount and duration of the withholding tax capture
revenues.
(17) The report described in subsection (1) must also include
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


the activities of the critical industry program described in
section 88s.
(18) The report described in subsection (1) must also include
the activities of the Michigan strategic site readiness program
described in section 88t.
(19) The fund shall cooperate with the department of treasury
and assist in preparing the report required under section 718 of
the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.718.
(20) The MEDC may perform the administrative functions of the
fund under this section on behalf of the fund.
(21) (20) As used in this section, "financial assistance"
means grants, loans, other economic assistance, and any other
incentives or assistance under this act.
Sec. 90j. (1) The good jobs for Michigan fund is created
within the state treasury. The state treasurer may receive money or
other assets from any source for deposit into the fund. The state
treasurer shall direct the investment of the fund. The state
treasurer shall credit all amounts deposited pursuant to section
51f 51f(1) of the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.51f,
to the fund and shall credit to the fund any interest and earnings
from fund investments. Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal
year shall remain remains in the fund and shall does not lapse to
the general fund.
(2) The good jobs for Michigan fund may be used only for 1 or
more of the following purposes:
(a) To make withholding tax capture revenue payments in
accordance with a written agreement to an authorized business
within not later than 90 days after receipt of a request for
payment and a copy of the withholding certificate issued under
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


section 90i.
(b) To distribute an amount equal to 5% of the withholding tax
capture revenue payments certified under section 90i to the
Michigan strategic fund to pay for administration administrative
expenses.
CHAPTER 8F
Sec. 90t. As used in this chapter:
(a) "Affiliated business" means a person that is at least 50%
owned and controlled, directly or indirectly, by an associated
business.
(b) "Associated business" means a person that is at least 50%
owned and controlled, directly or indirectly, by an eligible
business.
(c) "Authorized employer" means an eligible business that has
met the requirements under section 90w, 90x, or 90y, as applicable,
and that has entered into a written agreement with the fund for
withholding tax capture revenues under this chapter and section 51f
of the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.51f, and any
related business that also has entered into the written agreement
with the fund.
(d) "Base employment level" means the number of full-time jobs
in this state of an eligible business and any related business when
the eligible business or related business enters into a written
agreement under this chapter, as determined by the fund.
(e) "Casino" means a casino regulated by this state under the
Michigan Gaming Control and Revenue Act, 1996 IL 1, MCL 432.201 to
432.226, a casino at which gaming is conducted under the Indian
gaming regulatory act, Public Law 100-497, or property associated
or affiliated with the operation of either type of casino described
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


in this subdivision, including, but not limited to, a parking lot,
hotel, or motel.
(f) "Certified new job" means a full-time job created by an
authorized employer or connected employer pursuant to a written
agreement under section 90w or 90x at a facility that is in excess
of any base employment level or qualifying employment level
applicable under the written agreement. Certified new job does not
include a full-time job relocated from another location in this
state to the facility.
(g) "Collocated employer" means a person that has entered into
a contract with an authorized employer to employ individuals at the
location of the facility of the authorized employer for a period of
1 or more years.
(h) "Connected employer" means a collocated employer or a
qualified supplier.
(i) "Eligible business" means a person other than a retail
establishment, professional sports stadium, casino, or that portion
of an eligible business used exclusively for retail sales that
proposes to create certified new jobs in this state under section
90w or 90x or maintain protected jobs in this state under section
90y and that, as determined by the fund, satisfies all of the
following:
(i) Is located in or plans to locate in this state.
(ii) Is organized pursuant to and in good standing under the
laws of the state in which the person was formed.
(iii) Is registered to conduct business in this state and is in
good standing under the laws of this state.
(iv) Has the power to enter into an agreement with the fund
under this chapter.
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


(j) "Eligible distressed area" means that term as defined in
section 11 of the state housing development authority act of 1966,
1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1411.
(k) "Facility" means a site or sites within this state in
which an authorized employer, connected employer, eligible
business, or related business creates or proposes to create
certified new jobs under section 90w or 90x or maintains or
proposes to maintain protected jobs under section 90y, as
determined by the fund. Facility does not include a site within
this state with respect to which an authorized employer, connected
employer, eligible business, or related business received any of
the following:
(i) A qualified investment under the critical industry program
under section 88s.
(ii) A grant, loan, or other economic assistance under the
Michigan strategic site readiness program under section 88t.
(iii) Tax credits authorized under the Michigan economic growth
authority act, 1995 PA 24, MCL 207.801 to 207.810.
(l) "Full-time job" means a job based in this state that is
performed by an individual who is employed for consideration for
not less than 35 hours of work each week and for whom an employer
withholds income taxes under the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA
281, MCL 206.1 to 206.847, and United States Social Security taxes.
(m) "Geographically disadvantaged area" means a geographic
area in this state that includes 1 or more of the following:
(i) A qualified opportunity zone as that term is defined in 26
USC 1400Z-1.
(ii) A HUBZone as that term is defined in 13 CFR 126.103.
(n) "More jobs for Michigan fund" means the more jobs for
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


Michigan fund created in section 90v.
(o) "Prosperity region" means that term as defined in section
90g.
(p) "Prosperity region median wage" means the median annual
wage for the prosperity region where a facility is or will be
located based on the most recent data made available by the
Michigan bureau of labor market information and strategic
initiatives.
(q) "Protected jobs" means the number of full-time jobs at a
facility of an authorized employer maintained in this state on a
specific date as that date and number of full-time jobs are
determined by the fund.
(r) "Qualified supplier" means a person located or operating
in this state that meets all of the following requirements:
(i) Creates 10 or more new full-time jobs in this state as a
result of a new or increased business activity in this state
between the person and an authorized employer, eligible business,
or related business, as determined by the fund.
(ii) Provides both of the following to an authorized employer,
eligible business, or related business pursuant to a contract
between the person and the authorized employer, eligible business,
or related business:
(A) $5,000,000.00 or more of tangible personal property or
services to the authorized employer, eligible business, or related
business in a calendar year, as determined by the fund.
(B) 10% or more of the total tangible personal property or
services provided to the authorized employer, eligible business, or
related business in a calendar year, as determined by the fund.
(s) "Qualifying employment level" means not less than 3,000
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


full-time jobs in this state with a median annual wage of 150% or
more of the prosperity region median wage as of a date provided in
a written agreement under section 90x.
(t) "Related business" means an affiliated business, an
associated business, or a subsidiary business.
(u) "Subsidiary business" means a person that is directly or
indirectly controlled or at least 80% owned by an eligible
business.
(v) "United States Consumer Price Index" means the United
States Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers as defined and
reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor
Statistics, including any successor index.
(w) "Withholding tax capture revenues" means the amount of
income tax withheld under chapter 17 of the income tax act of 1967,
1967 PA 281, MCL 206.701 to 206.718, each calendar year that is
attributable to individuals employed in certified new jobs under
section 90w or 90x or protected jobs under section 90y pursuant to
a written agreement.
(x) "Written agreement" means a written agreement made between
the fund and an eligible business under section 90w, 90x, or 90y
and any related business.
Sec. 90u. (1) The fund shall create the more jobs for Michigan
program to authorize the transfer of a dedicated portion of
withholding tax capture revenues to authorized employers that
provide certified new jobs in this state in excess of a base
employment level under section 90w, provide certified new jobs in
connection with a transformational job creation project in excess
of any base employment level or qualifying employment level under
section 90x, or maintain protected jobs in this state under section
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


90y. The program shall be operated and administered in compliance
with this chapter by the authorized employees, officers, and agents
of the fund, which may include employees of the MEDC. Except as
otherwise provided in this subsection, the board may delegate to
its president, its vice president, employees of the fund, or
employees or officers of the MEDC, the functions and
responsibilities under this chapter that the board considers
necessary or appropriate to administer this chapter. The fund shall
adopt program guidelines and use a detailed application, approval,
and compliance process that is published and available on the
fund's website. However, the fund shall not enter into a written
agreement under this chapter unless both of the following
requirements are met:
(a) The board adopts a resolution authorizing the fund to
enter into the written agreement.
(b) Before adopting the resolution described in subdivision
(a), the fund provides written notice of the meeting at which the
proposed resolution is on the agenda to all of the following:
(i) The senate majority leader.
(ii) The senate minority leader.
(iii) The speaker of the house of representatives.
(iv) The minority leader of the house of representatives.
(v) The members of the senate and house of representatives who
represent the municipality in which the facility is located.
(vi) The local governing body of the municipality in which the
facility is located.
(2) An eligible business and 1 or more related businesses may
apply to the fund under section 90w, 90x, or 90y to enter into a
written agreement that authorizes the payment of withholding tax
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


capture revenues under this chapter. Each applicant shall submit
with the application a certified schedule listing all violations
within the 3-year period immediately preceding the date of the
application. The schedule must include any information required by
the fund to comply with this subdivision. For any violation that is
not a resolved violation, the schedule must include an action plan
on resolving the violation. If the schedule or other information
available to the fund indicates that an applicant has a violation
that is not a resolved violation, the fund shall not enter into a
written agreement with the applicant unless the applicant submits
evidence, to the satisfaction of the fund, that there is a
sufficient action plan to resolve the violation or the violation is
in the process of being resolved. The fund shall not enter into a
written agreement with the applicant if the schedule or other
information available to the fund indicates that either of the
following applies:
(a) In the 3-year period immediately preceding the date of
application, the applicant has been issued 5 or more notices of
violation of environmental regulations, or has an administrative
consent order or a consent judgment involving environmental
regulations that includes stipulated penalties, unless the
department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy finds the
applicant has made improvements in operations to come into
compliance with this state's environmental regulations, or other
demonstrated ability to comply with this state's environmental
regulations.
(b) In the 3-year period immediately preceding the date of
application, the applicant was subject to any of the following:
(i) A criminal penalty under section 35(4) or 35a(4) of the
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


Michigan occupational safety and health act, 1974 PA 154, MCL
408.1035 and 408.1035a, for a willful or repeated violation of the
Michigan occupational safety and health act, 1974 PA 154, MCL
408.1001 to 408.1094, an order issued under that act, or a rule or
standard promulgated under that act.
(ii) A criminal conviction under section 35(5) or 35a(5) of the
Michigan occupational safety and health act, 1974 PA 154, MCL
408.1035 and 408.1035a, for a willful violation of the Michigan
occupational safety and health act, 1974 PA 154, MCL 408.1001 to
408.1094, an order issued under that act, or a rule or standard
promulgated under that act that causes the death of an employee.
(iii) Inclusion in the Michigan occupational safety and health
administration's severe violator enforcement program.
(3) The fund may request information, in addition to that
contained in an application and the schedule as the fund determines
necessary to permit the fund to discharge its responsibilities
under this chapter.
(4) The amount of withholding tax capture revenues certified
by the department of treasury to be paid to an authorized employer
may be reduced by not more than 4%, as determined by the fund and
provided in a written agreement, and that amount must be retained
by the fund or the MEDC for administrative expenses incurred by the
fund or the MEDC under this chapter. The fund may enter into an
agreement with the MEDC and the department of treasury regarding
the administration of this chapter and related administrative
expenses.
(5) A written agreement must include, without limitation,
information required under section 90w, 90x, or 90y, and all of the
following, as applicable:
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


(a) A description of any expansion, development, facility, or
location that is the subject of the written agreement.
(b) Conditions on which the designation as an authorized
employer is made.
(c) A statement from the authorized employer that the
authorized employer would not otherwise add certified new jobs
under section 90w or 90x or retain protected jobs under section 90y
as provided for under the written agreement without the withholding
tax capture revenue payments authorized under this chapter.
(d) A provision indicating that misrepresentation in an
application under this chapter may result in the revocation of the
designation as an authorized employer and the repayment of some or
all of the withholding tax capture revenues received under this
chapter, which may include a penalty equal to 10% of the
withholding tax capture revenue payments received under this
chapter.
(e) A method for measuring and verifying certified new jobs
required pursuant to the written agreement.
(f) A method for measuring and verifying protected jobs
maintained pursuant to the written agreement.
(g) A provision requiring the authorized employer that is
certified under this chapter for a payment from the more jobs for
Michigan fund to do both of the following:
(i) File the information, returns, or reports required under
this chapter and chapter 17 of the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA
281, MCL 206.701 to 206.718, with the department of treasury.
(ii) Provide any other information reasonably requested by the
fund, the MEDC, or the department of treasury.
(h) A maximum amount of withholding tax capture revenues that
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


an authorized employer may claim before reduction of the not more
than 4% payment for administrative expenses under subsection (4),
as provided in the written agreement.
(i) Specific penalties for noncompliance with the written
agreement, including, but not limited to, provisions for a clawback
of disbursements to the authorized employer under the written
agreement, as provided in the written agreement.
(j) A provision for the termination of the written agreement.
(k) An audit provision requiring the fund to verify that the
authorized employer has satisfied the requirements of the written
agreement.
(l) A provision requiring the authorized employer to disclose
to the fund whether, to the knowledge of the authorized employer,
there are any pending legal proceedings that could have a
materially adverse effect on the authorized employer, a facility
that is the subject of the written agreement, or the performance of
the obligations of the authorized employer under the written
agreement.
(m) A provision requiring an authorized employer and any
general contractor or subcontractor of the authorized employer to
comply with any requirements applicable under laws specified in the
written agreement.
(n) A projected schedule of withholding tax capture revenues
permitted under the written agreement, which may be updated by the
fund to ensure an accurate projection of withholding tax capture
revenues and compliance with this chapter during the term of the
written agreement.
(6) On execution of a written agreement under this chapter, an
eligible business and any related business is an authorized
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


employer. The fund shall provide a copy of each written agreement
to the department of treasury. On execution of the written
agreement, the transfer and payment of withholding tax capture
revenues as specified in this chapter and in the written agreement
is binding on this state and the authorized employer. The state
treasurer shall calculate, based on this chapter and the written
agreements received under this subsection, the amount of
withholding tax capture revenues collected as a result of the
certified new jobs created or protected jobs maintained pursuant to
this chapter and those written agreements for each calendar year
and the percentage of that amount that needs to be transferred from
the general fund and deposited, in accordance with section 51f of
the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.51f, into the more
jobs for Michigan fund. The fund shall issue payments to the
authorized employer in a manner consistent with this chapter and
retain money for administration of this chapter as permitted by
this chapter.
(7) The state treasurer shall develop methods and processes
that are necessary for the authorized employer to report the amount
of withholding under chapter 17 of the income tax act of 1967, 1967
PA 281, MCL 206.701 to 206.718, from individuals employed in
certified new jobs or protected jobs and for the determination of
withholding tax capture revenues under this chapter and the income
tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.1 to 206.847.
(8) The fund may enter into agreements with an eligible
business other than an authorized employer, including, but not
limited to, a connected employer, as the fund determines necessary
for the implementation and enforcement of this chapter and a
written agreement with an authorized employer under this chapter.
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


(9) Subject to any limits applicable under this section or
section 90w, 90x, or 90y, an authorized employer is eligible to
receive withholding tax capture revenue payments under this chapter
as provided in this chapter.
(10) Except as otherwise provided under subsection (11), the
fund shall issue a withholding certificate each calendar year to an
authorized employer pursuant to the written agreement that states
all of the following:
(a) That the authorized employer is an authorized employer
under this chapter.
(b) The amount of withholding tax capture revenues to be paid
to the authorized employer from the more jobs for Michigan fund for
the designated calendar year.
(c) The authorized employer's federal employer identification
number or the Michigan treasury number assigned to the authorized
employer, or both.
(11) The fund shall provide the department of treasury with a
copy of each withholding certificate issued under this section. On
receipt of a withholding certificate, an authorized employer may
request a payment from the more jobs for Michigan fund by filing a
copy of the withholding certificate with the fund. The fund shall
issue the withholding tax capture revenue payment from the more
jobs for Michigan fund not later than 90 days after receipt of the
request for payment from the authorized employer.
(12) The fund may retain an amount that is not more than 4% of
the withholding tax capture revenue payments authorized for that
year for the fund and the MEDC as provided in written agreements.
The fund may use the amount described in this subsection to pay for
the administrative expenses under this chapter. The fund may use
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


application fees or administrative fees received for activities
authorized under this chapter and for the administrative activities
of the fund and the MEDC authorized under this chapter.
(13) As a condition of being an authorized employer, an
authorized employer authorizes the fund to identify the authorized
employer and disclose the amount and duration of the withholding
tax capture revenue payments. The fund shall publish the
information described in this subsection on the fund's website and
include this information in the report required under section 9.
(14) In the event of a proposed reorganization, merger, or
other change of ownership of the authorized business for which
reimbursement will continue pursuant to a written agreement, the
approval of the fund is required before the assignment or transfer
of the written agreement. If a written agreement is assigned or
transferred under this subsection, the new owner is responsible for
the consequences of any of the following that occur in the 12
months immediately preceding the date on which the written
agreement is assigned or transfer:
(a) A violation of the written agreement.
(b) An audit determination.
(c) The imposition of a penalty under the written agreement.
(15) The legislature finds and declares that activity under
this chapter to promote economic development and support job
creation and protection in this state is for a public purpose.
(16) The fund may not enter into a new agreement under this
chapter after December 31, 2032.
(17) As used in subsection (2):
(a) "Resolved violation" means a violation where the terms of
a settlement, consent agreement, conviction, decision, or other
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


final determination has been fully satisfied.
(b) "Violation" means a formal enforcement action issued by
this state, a political subdivision of this state, or the federal
government in response to a violation of environmental,
occupational safety, or public health regulations that has occurred
in this state, including, but not limited to, a violation notice,
enforcement notice, order to correct, licensing violation notice,
and stop work order.
Sec. 90v. (1) The more jobs for Michigan fund is created in
the state treasury.
(2) The state treasurer shall deposit money and assets
received under section 51f(2) of the income tax act of 1967, 1967
PA 281, MCL 206.51f, or from any other source in the more jobs for
Michigan fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of
money in the more jobs for Michigan fund and credit interest and
earnings from the investments to the more jobs for Michigan fund.
(3) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year remains
in the fund and does not lapse to the general fund.
(4) The fund is the administrator of the more jobs for
Michigan fund for audits of the more jobs for Michigan fund.
(5) The fund shall expend money from the more jobs for
Michigan fund, on appropriation, only to make withholding tax
capture revenue payments in accordance with a written agreement
within 90 days after receipt of a request for payment and a copy of
the withholding certificate issued under this chapter.
(6) For any future state fiscal year that the fund, after
consultation with the department of treasury, projects that
withholding tax capture revenue payments will be required to be
paid to an authorized employer under this chapter, the fund shall
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


notify the state budget director of that required activity for
inclusion in annual proposals developed by the state budget
director under section 344 of the management and budget act, 1984
PA 431, MCL 18.1344. In preparing an executive budget for that
fiscal year for submission to the legislature as provided in
section 348 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL
18.1348, the state budget director shall include an appropriation
from the more jobs for Michigan fund for the purpose of making
withholding tax capture revenue payments from the more jobs for
Michigan fund required under this chapter. The legislature shall
appropriate money from the more jobs for Michigan fund for the
purpose of making payments from the more jobs for Michigan fund
required under this chapter.
Sec. 90w. (1) After receipt of an application in a form
determined by the fund, the fund may enter into a written agreement
with the applicant for withholding tax capture revenues under this
chapter if the fund determines that all of the following
requirements are or will be satisfied:
(a) Subject to subdivisions (b) and (c), the applicant
proposes to create at a facility 1 or more of the following:
(i) 10 or more certified new jobs that pay at least 175% of the
prosperity region median wage.
(ii) 10 or more certified new jobs at a facility in a county
with a population of 50,000 or less that pay at least 135% of the
prosperity region median wage.
(iii) 250 or more certified new jobs that pay at least 150% of
the prosperity region median wage.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), an
applicant must meet 1 of the following timelines, as applicable, or
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


both the applicant and the fund are released from the written
agreement:
(i) For an applicant whose location or expansion in this state
requires construction, including renovations or new construction,
the following timeline:
(A) The applicant must begin construction not later than 3
years after the date the written agreement is executed.
(B) The applicant must complete its first hire of an
individual to fill a certified new job not later than 2 years after
the start of construction.
(C) The applicant must create the certified new jobs as
provided in the written agreement and begin receiving withholding
tax capture revenues not later than 3 years after its first hire as
described in sub-subparagraph (B).
(ii) For an applicant whose location or expansion in this state
does not require construction, the following timeline:
(A) The applicant must complete its first hire of an
individual to fill a certified new job not later than 3 years after
the date the written agreement is executed.
(B) The applicant must create the certified new jobs as
provided in the written agreement and begin receiving withholding
tax capture revenues not later than 3 years after its first hire as
described in sub-subparagraph (A).
(c) The fund shall notify an applicant of an applicable
deadline under subdivision (b) not less than 90 days before the
deadline. The fund may extend an applicable deadline under
subdivision (b) for 1 year if the fund determines that the
applicant has proceeded in good faith with a location or expansion
in this state and there is good cause for the applicant's delay in
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


meeting the deadline. The fund may request, and the applicant shall
provide, any information the fund considers necessary to make the
determination under this subdivision.
(d) In addition to the certified new jobs specified in
subdivision (a), the applicant, if already located within this
state, agrees to a base employment level, as determined by the
fund.
(e) The plans for the creation of certified new jobs and any
renovation or new construction of a facility are economically
sound.
(f) The investment by the applicant and the creation of
certified new jobs in this state will serve the public purpose of
benefiting the people of this state by increasing opportunities for
employment and by strengthening the economy of this state as
determined by the fund.
(g) The withholding tax capture revenues offered under this
section and paid from the more jobs for Michigan fund are an
incentive to expand or locate the applicant in this state,
including, but not limited to, addressing a need for additional
assistance for deal closing or second stage company gap financing.
(h) A regional economic model cost benefit analysis recognized
by economic development professionals indicates that the proposed
payment of withholding tax capture revenues under this section to
the applicant will result in an overall positive fiscal impact to
this state.
(i) The applicant will create the requisite number of
certified new jobs within the time period provided in a written
agreement, as determined by the fund.
(j) The applicant will maintain the base employment level and
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


not less than the requisite number of certified new jobs throughout
the duration of the period of time that the applicant receives
withholding tax capture revenues paid from the more jobs for
Michigan fund. However, if the applicant fails to maintain the base
employment level and the requisite number of certified new jobs as
provided in the written agreement, the applicant will forfeit
withholding tax capture revenues for the period of time provided in
the written agreement.
(k) The applicant demonstrates to the satisfaction of the fund
that the applicant has paid taxes levied by the federal government,
this state, another state, or a political subdivision of this state
or another state that are due and payable by the applicant before
any penalty for nonpayment of the tax has attached, except for
taxes contested in good faith and pursuant to proceedings
authorized by law.
(l) The governing body of the municipality in which the
facility or proposed facility is located indicates its support for
the proposed expansion or new location.
(m) The applicant provides detailed hiring and training plans,
including any registered apprenticeships or certifications
provided, and agrees to coordinate with local workforce development
agencies, including local Michigan Works! Agencies, to attract and
train, if needed, a qualified workforce. As used in this
subdivision, "local Michigan Works! Agency" means a Michigan works
agency as that term is defined in section 3 of the Michigan works
one-stop service center system act, 2006 PA 491, MCL 408.113.
(2) If the fund determines that all of the requirements under
subsection (1) are or will be satisfied, subject to subsections (3)
and (4), the fund shall determine the amount and duration of the
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


withholding tax capture revenues to be authorized for the applicant
and shall enter into a written agreement as provided in this
chapter for a duration determined by the fund. Subject to
subsections (3) and (4), in determining the maximum amount and
maximum duration of the withholding tax capture revenues
authorized, the fund shall consider the following factors, if
applicable:
(a) The number of certified new jobs to be created.
(b) The degree to which the median annual wage of the
certified new jobs exceeds the prosperity region median wage.
(c) Whether providing an incentive for the creation of the
certified new jobs in this state aligns with any strategic plan for
state economic development applicable to the fund.
(d) Whether the applicant already has business operations
located in this state.
(e) Whether the certified new jobs created would be located in
an eligible distressed area or a geographically disadvantaged area.
(f) The level of investment by the applicant in relation to
the number of certified new jobs the applicant proposes to create.
(g) The potential impact of a proposed expansion, development,
or location on the economy of this state and the overall positive
return to this state.
(h) Whether the applicant has made a written commitment to
fund some portion of costs for applicable training of the
individuals who will perform the certified new jobs that will lead
to a professional or technical certification for these individuals.
(i) Whether the applicant will make a good-faith effort to
employ, if qualified, residents of this state at a facility.
(j) Whether the expansion or location of the applicant will
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


support or enable progress toward the following goals:
(i) Community enhancement or engagement opportunities.
(ii) Investing in this state's labor and workforce.
(iii) Enacting a workforce plan that includes recruitment,
hiring, training strategies, and advancement strategies for
employees.
(k) Whether the applicant has a recruitment and hiring plan to
increase employment opportunities for individuals with disabilities
or other individuals who are members of a targeted group identified
under section 51(d) of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC
51.
(l) Whether the applicant offers or intends to offer child care
services at its facility or provide child care assistance for its
employees.
(3) Subject to subsection (4), the fund may allow an applicant
to receive up to 100% of withholding tax capture revenues for
certified new jobs for a period of not more than 10 years.
(4) The fund may extend the period for payment of withholding
tax capture revenues by not more than an additional 10 years if the
applicant proposes to create not less than 1,000 certified new jobs
and also proposes investments in the facility that exceed
$1,000,000,000.00, as determined by the fund.
(5) After entering a written agreement under this section, the
fund shall post on its website or the website of the Michigan
economic development corporation the evaluation rubric detailing
which considerations were used to determine the maximum amount and
maximum duration of the withholding tax capture revenues authorized
under subsection (2) and the requirements under subsection (1).
(6) As used in this section, "applicant" means the eligible
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


business that submits an application to enter into a written
agreement under this section and any related business that also
will be a party to the written agreement.
Sec. 90x. (1) After receipt of an application in a form
determined by the fund, the fund may enter into a written agreement
with an applicant for withholding tax capture revenues under this
chapter if the fund determines that all of the following
requirements are or will be met:
(a) The applicant proposes a transformational job creation
project that will do both of the following:
(i) Create or provide for the creation of 3,000 or more
certified new jobs, in excess of any applicable base employment
level and the qualifying employment level, with a median annual
wage of 150% or more of the prosperity region median wage by a date
provided in the written agreement.
(ii) Invest $20,000,000,000.00 or more in excess of the
qualifying investment level in a proposed facility by a date to be
included in the written agreement with the applicant.
(b) The applicant proposes to create the certified new jobs
specified in subdivision (a) not more than 10 years after achieving
the qualifying employment level.
(c) The facility and the creation of the certified new jobs
are determined by the fund to be in the economic interests of this
state.
(d) The facility and the creation of certified new jobs will
benefit the people of this state by increasing activities for
employment and strengthening the economy of this state, as
determined by the fund.
(e) The withholding tax capture revenues available under this
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


chapter and paid from the more jobs for Michigan fund are an
incentive to expand or locate the applicant in this state and
address the economic competitiveness of this state, as determined
by the fund.
(f) The qualifying employment level and qualifying investment
level will be reached within not more than 10 years as provided in
the written agreement.
(g) Any applicable base employment level and the qualifying
employment level will be maintained throughout the duration of the
period of time that the applicant receives withholding tax capture
revenues paid from the more jobs for Michigan fund.
(h) The applicant demonstrates to the satisfaction of the fund
that the applicant has paid taxes levied by the federal government,
this state, another state, or a political subdivision of this state
or another state that are due and payable by the applicant before
any penalty for nonpayment of the tax has attached, except for
taxes contested in good faith and pursuant to proceedings
authorized by law.
(2) If the fund determines that all of the requirements under
subsection (1) are or will be met, subject to subsection (3), the
fund shall determine the amount and duration of the withholding tax
capture revenues to be authorized under this section and shall
enter into a written agreement as provided in this section for a
duration determined by the fund. Subject to subsection (3), in
determining the maximum amount and maximum duration of the
withholding tax capture revenues authorized in the written
agreement, the fund shall consider the following factors, if
applicable:
(a) The number of certified new jobs to be created.
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


(b) The degree to which the median annual wage of the
certified new jobs exceeds the median annual wage in the prosperity
region in which the proposed facility would be located.
(c) The potential impact of the proposed expansion,
development, or location on the economy of this state.
(d) The estimated amount of withholding tax capture revenues
under this section and the value of assistance provided by persons
or entities other than this state.
(e) Whether the proposed expansion, development, or location
will occur in this state without the payment of withholding tax
capture revenues offered under this section.
(f) Whether the applicant has approval for a grant, loan, or
other financial assistance for the investment in the facility from
the federal government or would be eligible to claim a federal
investment tax credit for the investment in the facility.
(3) The fund may allow an applicant to receive up to 100% of
withholding tax capture revenues for certified new jobs for a
period of not more than 30 years.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) "Applicant" means the eligible business that submits an
application to enter into a written agreement under this section
and any related business that also will be a party to the written
agreement.
(b) "Qualifying investment level" means an investment of not
less than $20,000,000,000.00 made at a facility as of a date
provided in a written agreement.
Sec. 90y. (1) After receipt of an application in a form
determined by the fund, the fund may enter into a written agreement
under this chapter with an eligible business located in this state
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


for withholding tax capture revenues as provided under this section
if the fund determines that all of the following requirements are
or will be satisfied:
(a) The eligible business satisfies 1 or more of the
following:
(i) The eligible business maintains its North American
headquarters or global headquarters in this state.
(ii) The eligible business has at least 30% of its business
activity in this state engaged in nonmanufacturing activities.
(iii) The principal business operations of the eligible business
are located in this state.
(b) The eligible business proposes to maintain at a facility
50 or more full-time jobs within this state that otherwise are at
risk of transfer to another state or elimination.
(c) The eligible business proposes to maintain during the term
of a written agreement with the fund a base employment level,
including any protected jobs.
(d) The eligible business proposes to maintain during the term
of a written agreement with the fund annual payroll payments for
its full-time employees in this state at an amount equal to or
greater than annual payroll payments of the eligible business
during the calendar year immediately preceding the date the written
agreement is executed.
(e) The eligible business proposes to make new investments in
this state not later than 5 years after the date the written
agreement is executed equal to not less than $100,000.00 for each
protected job maintained under subdivision (b).
(f) The eligible business proposes to make additional
investment in this state during the term of the written agreement.
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


(g) The investment by the eligible business and the
maintenance of a base employment level, including any protected
jobs in this state, will serve the public purpose of benefiting the
people of this state by maintaining opportunities for employment
and by strengthening the economy of this state, as determined by
the fund.
(h) The withholding tax capture revenues offered under this
section and paid from the more jobs for Michigan fund are an
incentive to maintain the protected jobs in this state.
(i) A regional economic model cost benefit analysis recognized
by economic development professionals indicates that the proposed
payment of withholding tax capture revenues under this section to
an eligible business will avoid an overall negative fiscal impact
to this state.
(j) The eligible business will maintain the base employment
level and the payroll for the protected jobs throughout the
duration of the written agreement. However, if the eligible
business fails to maintain the base employment level, including the
requisite number of protected jobs as provided in the written
agreement, the eligible business will forfeit withholding tax
capture revenues as provided in the written agreement.
(k) The eligible business demonstrates to the satisfaction of
the fund that the eligible business has paid taxes levied by the
federal government, this state, another state, or a political
subdivision of this state or another state that are due and payable
by the eligible business before any penalty for nonpayment of the
tax has attached, except for taxes contested in good faith and
pursuant to proceedings authorized by law.
(2) If the fund determines that all of the requirements under
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


subsection (1) are or will be satisfied, subject to subsection (3),
the fund shall determine the amount and duration of the withholding
tax capture revenues to be authorized under this section and shall
enter into a written agreement as provided in this section for a
duration determined by the fund. Subject to subsection (3), in
determining the maximum amount and maximum duration of the
withholding tax capture revenues authorized, the fund shall
consider the following factors, if applicable:
(a) The base employment level and the number of protected jobs
to be maintained.
(b) Whether providing an incentive for the maintenance of the
protected jobs in this state aligns with any strategic plan for
state economic development applicable to the fund.
(c) Whether the protected jobs maintained are located in an
eligible distressed area or a geographically disadvantaged area.
(d) The impact of maintaining the protected jobs on the supply
chain in this state.
(e) The level of investment by the eligible business in
relation to the number of protected jobs the eligible business
proposes to maintain.
(f) The potential impact of maintenance of the protected jobs
on the economy of this state and the overall positive return to
this state.
(3) The fund may allow an eligible business to receive up to
100% of withholding tax capture revenues for protected jobs for a
period of not more than 20 years.
(4) As used in this section, "principal business operations"
means the location or locations of a person where not less than 60%
of its employees work or where employees of the person paid not
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


less than 60% of the person's total payroll expenditures perform
work for the person.
Sec. 90z. (1) Not later than March 15 and September 15 of each
year, the fund shall transmit to each member of the legislature,
the governor, the clerk of the house of representatives, the
secretary of the senate, and the senate and house fiscal agencies a
report on the activities of the more jobs for Michigan program. The
report must include all of the following for each written agreement
entered into under this chapter:
(a) The name of the authorized employer.
(b) The number of certified new jobs or protected jobs
required to be created or maintained.
(c) The amount and duration of the withholding tax capture
revenues.
(2) Not later than January 1, 2032, the fund shall conduct a
formal review of the more jobs for Michigan program and submit a
report to the senate and house of representatives appropriations
subcommittees with jurisdiction over the budget of the fund, the
senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy
offices, and the state budget office on the performance and
effectiveness of the more jobs for Michigan program. The department
may use the economic development incentive evaluations prepared
under the economic development incentive evaluation act, 2018 PA
540, MCL 18.1751 to 18.1759, to satisfy this subsection.
Enacting section 1. The Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36,
MCL 208.1101 to 208.1519, is repealed effective for tax years that
begin after December 31, 2030.
Enacting section 2. The Michigan economic growth authority
act, 1995 PA 24, MCL 207.801 to 207.810, is repealed effective
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc


December 31, 2030.
Enacting section 3. This amendatory act does not take effect
unless Senate Bill No. 472 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into
law.
Final Page
ERE S00973'25 (S-1) tn61rc